Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-207] Premiums charged--group and
individual policies. (a) The premium charged to an insured shall not
increase due to either:

(1) Increasing age of the insured at ages beyond
sixty-five; or

(2) The duration the insured has been covered under
the policy.

(b) The purchase of additional coverage shall
not be considered a premium rate increase, but for purposes of the calculation
required under section 431:10H-233, the portion of the premium attributable to
the additional coverage shall be added to and considered part of the initial
annual premium.

(c) A reduction of benefits shall not be
considered a premium change, but for purpose of calculation required under
section 431:10H-233, the initial annual premium shall be based on reduced
benefits. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next